Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-483
Recall pen; captive wildlife permit required; permit.

The
construction, operation, and maintenance of a facility commonly known as a
recall pen, also known as a recapture pen, which is used for the recapture
of marked game birds originating from the holder of a captive wildlife permit
in conjunction with dog training or dog trial activities shall be legal if
the person owning or controlling such recall pen, prior to the operation thereof, holds a captive wildlife permit and complies
with section 37-479. The commission shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations for the issuance of permits for recall pens and for
the possession and use of recall pens. Nothing in this section shall authorize
the use of recall pens for the trapping of other wild birds.

Laws 1972, LB 1447, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-501.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 193;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 63;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 12;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 15.